Utah statutes.
78A-6-120.    Continuing jurisdiction of juvenile court -- Period of and termination of jurisdiction -- Notice of discharge from custody of local mental health authority or Utah State Developmental Center -- Transfer of continuing jurisdiction to other district.

(1)  Jurisdiction of a minor obtained by the court through adjudication under Section 78A-6-117 continues for purposes of this chapter until he becomes 21 years of age, unless terminated earlier.  However, the court, subject to Section 78A-6-121, retains jurisdiction beyond the age of 21 of a person who has refused or failed to pay any fine or victim restitution ordered by the court, but only for the purpose of causing compliance with existing orders.

(2) (a)  The continuing jurisdiction of the court terminates:

(i)  upon order of the court;

(ii)  upon commitment to a secure youth corrections facility; or

(iii)  upon commencement of proceedings in adult cases under Section 78A-6-1001.

(b)  The continuing jurisdiction of the court is not terminated by marriage.

(3)  When a minor has been committed by the court to the physical custody of a local mental health authority or its designee or to the Utah State Developmental Center, the local mental health authority or its designee or the superintendent of the Utah State Developmental Center shall give the court written notice of its intention to discharge, release, or parole the minor not fewer than five days prior to the discharge, release, or parole.

(4)  Jurisdiction over a minor on probation or under protective supervision, or of a minor who is otherwise under the continuing jurisdiction of the court, may be transferred by the court to the court of another district, if the receiving court consents, or upon direction of the chair of the Board of Juvenile Court Judges.  The receiving court has the same powers with respect to the minor that it would have if the proceedings originated in that court.

